North Dakota, session 69, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Newly created ful l - time equivalent position funding pool - Transfers of general fund
appropriation authority - Budget section report.
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on July first of each odd - numbered year ,
each institution under the control of the state board of higher education shall transfer
all general fund appropriation authority for the current biennium relating to the full-time
equivalent positions identified as vacant and newly created positions as of December
first of the most recent even-numbered year to a central fund at the institution .
2. Each institution shall maintain a portion of the general fund appropriation in a
designated position funding pool as provided for in this section.
3. Each institution shall report to the state board of higher education which shall report to
each regular meeting of the budget section regarding salaries and wages, position
information, and operational use of funding, if applicable, in the pool including amounts
transferred from the pool, information on vacant full-time equivalent positions including
dates the positions were vacated and filled, and the operational use of funds.
Page No. 1 25.0636.02000